Missouri, session 2026, SB1304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.012, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
578.006 and 578.012, to read as follows:
578.006. 1. A person commits the offense of making a
malicious false report of animal abuse if:
(1) The person purposely makes a report to a law
enforcement agency or an applicable government agency
alleging the abuse of any animal in a manner punishable
under section 578.012;
(2) The person knows that such a report is false;
(3) The person makes the report with the purpose of
disrupting, harassing, causing a monetary loss to, or
disturbing the peace of the owner of the animal; and
(4) Such report causes a disruption, harassment,
monetary loss, or disturbance of the owner of the animal.
2. The offense of making a malicious false report of
animal abuse is a class C misdemeanor.
3. It shall be an absolute defense for a prosecution
of the offense of making a malicious false report of animal
abuse if the reporting party reported an incident of animal
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1304 2
abuse out of a good faith, reasonable belief that an animal
was being abused. The defendant shall have the burden of
injecting this defense under this subsection. If a
defendant asserts that his or her report of animal abuse was
made from a good faith, reasonable belief that an animal was
being abused, the state shall have the burden to prove
beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant did not have a
good faith, reasonable belief that such a report was true.
578.012. 1. A person commits the offense of animal
abuse if he or she:
(1) Intentionally or purposely kills an animal in any
manner not allowed by or expressly exempted from the
provisions of sections 578.005 to 578.023 and 273.030;
(2) Purposely or intentionally causes injury or
suffering to an animal; or
(3) Having ownership or custody of an animal knowingly
fails to provide adequate care which results in substantial
harm to the animal.
2. Animal abuse is a class A misdemeanor, unless the
defendant has previously been found guilty of animal abuse
or the suffering involved in subdivision (2) of subsection 1
of this section is the result of torture [or], mutilation
[consciously], starvation, or dehydration knowingly
inflicted while the animal was alive, in which case it is a
class E felony.
✓